Alaska statutes. Title 31. Oil and Gas.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1985 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58 SLA 1985, and in 1985, 2004, and 2012 to make other, minor word changes.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to oil and gas licenses and leases, see AS

38.05.131

—

38.05.134

,

38.05.160

,

38.05.177

, and

38.05.180

.

Collateral references. —

Williams and Meyers, Oil and Gas Law (Matthew Bender).

Bruce Kramer, Oil and Gas Reporter (Matthew Bender).

Martin and Kramer, Manual of Oil and Gas Terms (Matthew Bender).

Larry Crumbley, Oil, Gas and Energy Quarterly (Matthew Bender).

Rocky Mountain Mineral Law Foundation, Law of Federal Oil and Gas Leases (Matthew Bender).

Robert Polevoi, Federal Taxation of Oil and Gas Transactions (Matthew Bender).

Earl A. Brown, The Law of Oil and Gas Leases (Matthew Bender).

Muchow and Mogel, Energy Law and Transactions (Matthew Bender).

Kramer and Martin, The Law of Pooling and Unitization (Matthew Bender).

Maxfield, Miller, and Allen, Taxation of Mining Operations (Matthew Bender).

Rocky Mountain Mineral Law Foundation, American Law of Mining (Matthew Bender).

Polevoi and Smith, Federal Taxation of Oil and Gas Transactions (Matthew Bender).

William Mogel, Regulation of the Gas Industry (Matthew Bender).